Maryland, session 2025, HB1182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
[5–326.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1182*

HOUSE BILL 1182
All assets owned by any Methodist Church, including any former Methodist
Episcopal Church, Methodist Protestant Church, Methodist Episcopal Church, South, the
Washington Methodist Conference, or Evangelical United Brethren Church, whether
incorporated, unincorporated, or abandoned:
(1) Shall be held by the trustees of the church in trust for the United
Methodist Church; and
(2) Are subject to the discipline, usage, and ministerial appointments of the
United Methodist Church, as from time to time authorized and declared by the general
conference of that church.]
[5–327.
The absence of a trust clause in any deed or other conveyance executed before June
1, 1953, does not relieve or exclude a local church in any way from its Methodist
connectional responsibilities or from the provisions of this part and does not absolve a local
congregation or board of trustees of its responsibility to the United Methodist Church, if
such an intent of the founders or the later congregations and boards of trustees is indicated
by:
(1) The conveyance of the assets to the trustees of the local church or any
of its predecessors;
(2) The use of the name, customs, and polity of the United Methodist
Church in such a way as to be known to the community as part of this denomination; or
(3) The acceptance of the pastorate of ministers appointed by a bishop of
the United Methodist Church or employed by the superintendent of the district in which
the local church is located.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 5–328 of Article –
Corporations and Associations of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be
Section(s) 5–326.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.